Utah statutes.
58-5a-305.   License by endorsement.

The division may issue a license by endorsement to a person who holds a license to practice podiatry from another state, jurisdiction, or territory of the United States, if that person:

(1)  meets the requirements of Section 58-1-302; and

(2)  demonstrates to the board that he has been a licensed podiatric physician in the jurisdiction issuing his license for at least two years immediately prior to applying for a license under this section.



Amended by Chapter 232, 1996 General Session

